Hawaii statutes.
[§141-35]
Approved seed cultivars. (a) Industrial hemp shall be grown only if it is
on the list of approved seed cultivars. The board may from time to time add or
remove any seed cultivar from the list if the cultivar is found to be
noncompliant with this part.

(b) The list of approved seed cultivars shall
include the following:

(1) Industrial hemp seed cultivars that have been
certified by the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development; and

(2) Hawaii varieties of industrial hemp seed cultivars
that have been certified by the board. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next